Utah statutes.
63A-4-202.   Determination of insurance premiums -- Information furnished by agencies -- Notice to agencies.

(1)  Each agency shall provide the risk manager with all reasonable information necessary to compute insurance premiums  whenever he requests that information from them.

(2) (a)  The risk manager shall charge to each agency that receives insurance coverage from the Risk Management Fund its proportionate share of the cost incurred based upon actuarially sound rating techniques.

(b)  That premium shall include all costs of operating the fund as stated in Section 63A-4-201.

(3)  To enable each participating agency to meet its budgeting requirements, the risk manager shall provide each participating agency with projected insurance costs for the next two fiscal years within the time limits required.

